Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7532
Hearing; procedure.

If a hearing is held at the request of a party other than the director, unless mutually agreed upon by the director and all interested parties, notice of hearing shall be provided within thirty days after the director's receipt of a written request for a hearing. Notice of hearing shall be given to all interested parties and shall state the time, place, and purpose of the hearing. Unless mutually agreed upon by the director and all interested parties, the hearing shall be held not less than ten days after notice is served. Unless mutually agreed upon by the director and all interested parties or unless the hearing is being held at the request of the director, the hearing shall be held not more than thirty days after notice is served.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 32.

The language in this section referring to notice to "all interested parties" contemplates notice by the Nebraska Department of Insurance to both the insured and the insurer regarding the adversarial proceeding to come. It would not be a sensible reading of the statutes to require notice to only one of the parties, where both parties are active in the proceeding but seek different outcomes. Travelers Indem. Co. v. Gridiron Mgmt. Group, 281 Neb. 113, 794 N.W.2d 143 (2011).